nl: Batterijkoffer binnenvulling materiaal: Geslotencellig schuim; Ethyleen-vinylacetaatschuim; Vilt; Traagschuim; Microvezelvoering; Gevormde rubberen voering; Neopreen; Geen voering; Opencellig schuim; PE-schuim; Polyurethaanschuim; Overig
nb: Batterieske indre utfyllingsmateriale: Lukkecellet skum; Etylen-vinylacetatskum; Filt; Minneskum; Mikrofiberfôr; Støpt gummifôr; Neopren; Ingen polstring; Åpencellet skum; PE-skum; Polyuretanskum; Annet
cs: Materiál vnitřního polstrování pouzdra na baterie: Pěna s uzavřenými póry; Ethylen vinylacetát pěnový; Plsť; Paměťová pěna; Podšívka z mikrovlákna; Tvarovaná gumová vložka; Neopren; Bez polstrování; Pěna s otevřenými póry; PE pěna; Polyuretanová pěna; Jiné
ro-RO: Material de căptușire internă pentru carcasa bateriei: Spumă cu celule închise; Spumă EVA; Pâslă; Spumă cu memorie; Căptușeală din microfibră; Căptușeală din cauciuc turnat; Neopren; Fără căptușeală; Spumă cu celule deschise; Spumă PE; Spumă PU; Altele
es: Material de relleno interior de la caja de batería: Espuma de celda cerrada; Espuma de etilvinilacetato; Fieltro; Espuma viscoelástica; Forro de microfibra; Forro de goma moldeada; Neopreno; Sin relleno; Espuma de celda abierta; Espuma de polietileno; Espuma de poliuretano; Otro
hr-HR: Materijal unutarnje obloge kutije za baterije: Pjena sa zatvorenim ćelijama; EVA pjena; Filc; Memorijska pjena; Podstava od mikrovlakana; Podstava od lijevane gume; Neopren; Bez podstave; Pjena s otvorenim ćelijama; PE pjena; PU pjena; Ostalo
ko: 배터리 케이스 내부 패딩 재질: 폐쇄형 셀 폼; EVA 폼; 펠트; 메모리 폼; 극세사 안감; 성형 고무 라이너; 네오프렌; 패딩 없음; 개방형 셀 폼; PE 폼; PU 폼; 기타
fi: Akkukotelon sisäpuolen pehmustemateriaali: Umpisoluvaahto; EVA-vaahto; Huopa; Muistivaahto; Mikrokuituvuori; Valettu kumivuori; Neopreeni; Ei pehmustetta; Avosoluvaahto; PE-vaahto; PU-vaahto; Muu
th: วัสดุบุกันกระแทกภายในเคสแบตเตอรี่: โฟมเซลล์ปิด; โฟมอีทิลีนไวนิลอะเซเทต; สักหลาด; เมมโมรีโฟม; ซับในไมโครไฟเบอร์; ยางรองขึ้นรูป; นีโอพรีน; ไม่มีวัสดุกันกระแทก; โฟมเซลล์เปิด; โฟม PE; โฟมโพลิยูรีเทน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Material de preenchimento interno da caixa para bateria: Espuma de célula fechada; Espuma EVA; Feltro; Espuma viscoelástica; Forro de microfibra; Forro de borracha moldada; Neoprene; Sem forro; Espuma de célula aberta; Espuma PE; Espuma PU; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál výstelky vnútornej časti puzdra batérie: Pena s uzavretými bunkami; EVA pena; Plsť; Pamäťová pena; Výstelka z mikrovlákna; Tvarovaná gumová výstelka; Neoprén; Bez výplne; Pena s otvorenými bunkami; PE pena; PU pena; Iné
en: Battery case interior padding material: Closed-cell foam; EVA foam; Felt; Memory foam; Microfiber lining; Molded rubber liner; Neoprene; No padding; Open-cell foam; PE foam; PU foam; Other
pt-PT: Material de preenchimento interno da caixa para bateria: Espuma de células fechadas; Espuma de etileno acetato de vinilo; Feltro; Espuma viscoelástica; Forro em microfibra; Forro de borracha moldada; Neopreno; Sem enchimento; Espuma de células abertas; Espuma de PE; Espuma de poliuretano; Outro
it: Batteria cassa interna spaziatura interna materiale: Schiuma a cellule chiuse; Schiuma di etilene acetato di vinile; Feltro; Memory foam; Fodera in microfibra; Rivestimento in gomma sagomata; Neoprene; Nessuna imbottitura; Schiuma a cellule aperte; Schiuma di PE; Schiuma di poliuretano; Altro
el: Υλικό εσωτερικής επένδυσης της θήκης μπαταρίας: Αφρός κλειστής κυψέλης; EVA foam; Τσόχα; Αφρός μνήμης; Επένδυση από μικροΐνες; Επένδυση από χυτό καουτσούκ; Νεοπρένιο; Χωρίς προστατευτική επένδυση; Αφρός ανοικτής κυψέλης; Αφρός PE; PU foam; Άλλο
lt-LT: Akumuliatoriaus dėklo vidinė paminkštinimo medžiaga: Uždarų porų putplastis; EVA foam; Veltinis; Viskoelastinis porolonas; Mikropluošto pamušalas; Formuotas guminis įdėklas; Neoprenas; Be paminkštinimo; Atvirų porų putplastis; PE putplastis; PU foam; Kita
de: Batteriebox-Innenpolstermaterial: Geschlossenzelliger Schaumstoff; EVA-Schaum; Filz; Memory-Schaum; Mikrofaserfutter; Geformte Gummieinlage; Neopren; Ohne Polsterung; Offenzelliger Schaumstoff; PE-Schaum; PU-Schaum; Sonstige
zh-TW: 電池盒內部緩衝材質: 閉孔泡棉; EVA 泡棉; 毛氈; 記憶海綿; 超細纖維內襯; 模製橡膠內襯; 氯丁橡膠; 無緩衝墊; 開孔泡棉; PE 泡棉; PU 泡棉; 其他
fr: Matériau de protection intérieure du boîtier de batterie: Mousse à cellules fermées; Mousse EVA; Feutre; Mousse à mémoire de forme; Doublure en microfibre; Doublure en caoutchouc moulé; Néoprène; Sans rembourrage; Mousse à cellules ouvertes; Mousse de PE; Mousse de PU; Autre
pl: Materiał wyściółki wnętrza walizki na akumulatory: Pianka o zamkniętych komórkach; Pianka EVA; Filc; Pianka z pamięcią kształtu; Wyściółka z mikrofibry; Formowana wkładka gumowa; Neopren; Bez wypełnienia; Pianka o otwartych komórkach; Pianka PE; Pianka PU; Inne
da: Materiale i batterikassens indvendige polstring: Lukket celleskum; EVA-skum; Filt; Memory-skum; Mikrofiberfor; Støbt gummiforing; Neopren; Ingen polstring; Åbent celleskum; PE-skum; PU-skum; Andet
bg-BG: Материал на вътрешната подложка на корпуса за батерии: Пяна със затворени клетки; EVA пяна; Филц; Мемори пяна; Микрофибърна подплата; Отлята гумена подплата; Неопрен; Без подплата; Пяна с отворени клетки; PE пяна; PU пяна; Друго
zh-CN: 电池盒内部衬垫材质: 闭孔泡沫; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯泡沫; 毛毡; 记忆海绵; 超细纤维内衬; 模压橡胶内衬; 氯丁橡胶; 无内垫; 开孔泡沫; PE 泡沫; 聚氨酯泡沫; 其他
hu: Akkumulátordoboz belső margóanyaga: Zárt cellás habszivacs; EVA foam; Filc; Memóriahab; Mikroszálas bélés; Formázott gumibélés; Neoprén; Nincs bélés; Nyílt cellás habszivacs; PE-hab; PU foam; Egyéb
tr: Batarya taşıma çantası iç dolgu malzemesi: Kapalı hücreli köpük; EVA köpük; Keçe; Hafızalı köpük; Mikrofiber astar; Kalıplanmış kauçuk astar; Neopren; Dolgu yok; Açık hücreli köpük; PE köpük; PU köpük; Diğer
ru: Материал внутренней обивки корпуса для батарей: Пеноматериал с закрытыми порами; Пеноматериал EVA; Фетр; Пена с эффектом памяти; Подкладка из микрофибры; Литая резиновая вставка; Неопрен; Без набивки; Пеноматериал с открытыми порами; Пенополиэтилен (PE); Пенополиуретан (PU); Другое
sl-SI: Material notranjega oblazinjenja ohišja za baterije: Pena z zaprtimi celicami; Pena EVA; Klobučevina; Spominska pena; Podloga iz mikrovlaken; Podloga iz oblikovane gume; Neopren; Brez oblazinjenja; Pena z odprtimi celicami; Pena PE; Pena PU; Drugo
vi: Chất liệu đệm bên trong hộp đựng pin: Mút xốp ô kín; Bọt EVA; Nỉ; Mút hoạt tính; Lớp lót vi sợi; Lớp đệm cao su đúc; Neoprene; Không có đệm lót; Mút xốp ô mở; Mút xốp PE; Bọt PU; Khác
sv: Fodermaterial för batterilåda: Skum med slutna celler; EVA-skum; Filt; Minnesskum; Mikrofiberfoder; Gjutet gummifoder; Neopren; Ingen vaddering; Skum med öppna celler; PE-skum; PU-skum; Övrigt
ja: バッテリーケース内部余白素材: 独立気泡フォーム; エチレン酢酸ビニルアセテートフォーム; フェルト; メモリーフォーム; マイクロファイバー裏地; 成型ラバーライナー; ネオプレン; パッドなし; 連続気泡フォーム; PE フォーム; ポリウレタンフォーム; その他